Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1050.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 3, article 1.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-511.26, to read: START_STATUTE41-511.26. Lifetime veteran's pass A. The arizona state parks board shall issue a lifetime veteran's pass at no charge to a person who Is currently a resident of this state and who has been a resident of this state for at least the past TWELVE months And who meets one of the following: 1. Submits satisfactory evidence that the person is a retired veteran of the armed forces of the united states. 2. is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a service-connected disability. B. The Lifetime veteran's pass shall grant park ENTRANCE for life to all state parks located in this state to the veteran and all passengers in the same personal vehicle as the veteran for sites that charge per vehicle or the veteran and up to three people at sites that charge per PERSON. END_STATUTE